Utah statutes.
53A-20b-204.   Limitation on participation in Charter School Credit Enhancement Program.

(1)  In accordance with Subsection (2), on or before January 1 of each year, the authority shall determine the credit enhancement program's bond issuance limitation.

(2)  The authority may not issue bonds for a qualifying charter school under the credit enhancement program if the total par amount outstanding under the program would exceed an amount equal to the product of:

(a)  1.3;

(b)  an amount equal to the quotient of:

(i)  annual charter school enrollment; divided by

(ii)  annual state enrollment; and

(c)  the total par amount then outstanding under the school bond guarantee program established in Chapter 28, Utah School Bond Guaranty Act.



Enacted by Chapter 201, 2012 General Session

